Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6058YH (6) 91 ms/js H.F. 2427 Section 1. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph g, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) Upon request by a peace officer, as defined in section 3 801.4 , civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, or state 4 or federal judicial officer or state or federal prosecutor, 5 United States senator, representative in Congress, statewide 6 elected official, member of the general assembly, or local 7 partisan elected official, the county assessor or the county 8 assessorâs staff, or the county recorder or the county 9 recorderâs staff, shall redact the requestorâs name contained 10 in electronic documents that are displayed for public access 11 through an internet site. 12 Sec. 2. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph g, 13 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 14 subparagraph. 15